Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8211
Investments; limitation on loans and investments.

(1) Captive insurers shall be subject to the types and nature of investments as set forth in the Insurers Investment Act, but not subject to any limitations contained in such act as to invested amounts, except that the director may prohibit or limit any investment that threatens the solvency or liquidity of any such captive insurer or if such investments are not made in accordance with the approved plan of operation.

(2) No captive insurer may make a loan to or an investment in its parent or affiliated entities without prior written approval of the director and any such transaction shall be evidenced by documentation approved by the director. Loans of minimum capital and surplus funds are prohibited.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 45.

Insurers Investment Act, see section 44-5101.